District of Columbia statutes.
1-319.04

Inapplicability to offices of United States Marshal or United States Attorney for the District of Columbia.

No provision of §§ 1-319.01 to 1-319.05 shall be deemed to apply to volunteers in the Offices of the United States Marshal or the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia.

History

June 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-12, § 5, 24 DCR 1442

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-307.
1973 Ed., § 1-215d.